Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3523
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature that costs incurred by the State of Nebraska attributable to the shipment of high-level radioactive waste and transuranic waste in or through the state shall be borne by the shipper.

Laws 2003, LB 165, § 1.